Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 3
DIRECT GRANTS TO LOCAL COLLEGE DISTRICTS

23-71-301. Direct grants to local college districts - occupational courses.

Colorado mountain college and Aims community college shall each annually receive a direct grant, from funds appropriated for this purpose, in an amount specified annually by the general assembly pursuant to section 23-18-304.

Repealed.

If a school district or group of school districts is annexed into an existing local college district pursuant to section 23-71-128, for at least five years after the date of the annexation, the commission shall annually consider recommending that the local college district's direct grant, after applying any adjustments set forth in section 23-18-304 (3), be increased as provided in section 23-18-304 (3)(b) to recognize increases in resident enrollment resulting from the annexation process.

Prior to recommending an increase to a local college district's direct grant pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, the Colorado commission on higher education shall consult with the governing board of the affected local college district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 762, § 1, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 789, § 1, effective July 28.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 280, § 28, effective June 29.

L. 78:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 388, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 81:

(3) amended, p. 1124, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 87:

(1)(b) amended and (2) and (3) repealed, p. 840, §§ 2, 4, effective June 16.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 486, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 2014:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 612, § 7, effective May 9.

L. 2015:

(1) amended, (HB 15-1224), ch. 94, p. 268, § 3, effective April 10.

L. 2019:

(4) added, (HB 19-1153), ch. 80, p. 288, § 2, effective August 2.

23-71-302. Distribution of grants.

The board shall annually certify to the state treasurer the amount of the direct grants to be paid to Colorado mountain college, Aims community college, and the area technical colleges, as specified by the general assembly and appropriated pursuant to section 23-18-304 for the applicable fiscal year. Each institution or area technical college may use the direct grants for current operating costs or for capital construction.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 752, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1125, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1) amended and (2) repealed, (HB 15-1224), ch. 94, p. 268, § 4, effective April 10.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 151, § 36, effective August 10.

23-71-303. Distributions to area technical colleges.

Any area technical college operating or organized and operating as such during the entire school year may be reimbursed by the state in an amount specified annually by the general assembly pursuant to section 23-18-304. Such reimbursement must not exceed the total direct cost of the vocational program per FTE.

Distributions made under this section shall be only for students with a declared objective in approved occupational courses and shall not include students enrolled with avocational objectives.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 763, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1128, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(1) amended, p. 574, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 840, § 3, effective June 16.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 487, § 2, effective March 31.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 612, § 8, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 151, § 37, effective August 10.

23-71-304. Area technical college grant program - established - report - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Area technical college" has the same meaning as defined in section 23-60-103 (1).

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education established pursuant to section 23-1-102.

"Department" means the department of higher education created pursuant to section 24-1-114.

"Grant program" means the area technical college grant program established pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

There is established in the department the area technical college grant program to provide up to four million dollars each fiscal year in grants to area technical colleges for identified capital construction and equipment purposes in addition to the direct grants received pursuant to section 23-18-304 (2)(a). On or before July 15, 2019, and on or before each July 15 thereafter, an area technical college may submit a grant application developed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section to the department. If more than one grant application is submitted during any year, on or before July 30, the area technical colleges shall jointly submit to the department a list of the grants in prioritized order. The department shall review the application and recommend to the commission whether to include money for the grant in its budget request pursuant to section 23-18-304 (2) for the following state fiscal year. The commission shall determine whether to include money for the grant in the budget request, and, if the commission includes more than one grant in its request, the commission shall prioritize the requests. If the department receives money for the grant, the department shall transmit the full amount of the grant to the area technical college.

The department shall develop a form for the grant application that must include:

Identification of how the grant money will be spent;

Specification of how the grant money will benefit students and any program at the school; and

Any matching money to be added to the grant money and the source of the matching money.

If an area technical college receives grant money pursuant to this section, on or before August 1 of the budget year following any expenditure of money from a grant, the area technical college shall submit a report to the department on a form developed by the department that must include:

The amount of the grant received;

The total amount of grant expenditures made during the previous budget year;

An itemization of the grant expenditures made during the previous budget year; and

the impact of the grant expenditures on students.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-097), ch. 115, p. 489, § 2, effective April 16.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-097, see section 1 of chapter 115, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.